Hawaii statutes.
[§346-383] Meetings; quorum. (a) The
Hawaii interagency council on homelessness shall meet quarterly, or more
frequently as it deems necessary.

(b) A majority of the members of the Hawaii
interagency council on homelessness shall constitute a quorum to do business
and to validate any decision or act of the council. [L 2012, c 105, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next